Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1301.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 23-101 of Title 26, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created to continue until December 31, 2027,
the Task Force on Young Voter Engagement. The task force will
examine the issues related to voter turnout for voters under the age
of thirty (30) years and shall provide a report with recommendations
to the Legislature and the Governor's Office.
B. The task force will have nine (9) members as follows:

Req. No. 10735 Page 1

1. Three persons between eighteen (18) and twenty-four (24)
years of age appointed by the Governor;
2. Three persons between eighteen (18) and twenty-four (24)
years of age appointed by the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of
Representatives; and
3. Three persons between eighteen (18) and twenty-four (24)
years of age appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the State
Senate.
C. The task force shall meet on the first Monday of each month
until December 31, 2027.
D. The Oklahoma House of Representatives shall provide space
for the task force to meet.
E. Meetings of the task force shall be subject to the Oklahoma
Open Meetings Act outlined in Title 25.
F. The task force shall publish its findings and
recommendations by December 1, 2027, including recommendations for
any resulting legislation.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10735 MJ 01/08/25




Req. No. 10735 Page 2